Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LOCAL GOVERNMENT CONNECT 700 PILOT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin Hennepin County and Ramsey County must establish a 700-hour on-the-job demonstration experience pilot program to hire qualified applicants with disabilities in each county in accordance with the requirements of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program administration and procedures. new text end new text begin (a) Hennepin County and Ramsey County must establish, review, and modify the qualifying procedures for hiring applicants who have disabilities that make the applicant unable to demonstrate the applicant's abilities in the selection process. The qualifying procedures must consist of up to 700 hours of on-the-job demonstration experience. The 700-hour on-the-job demonstration experience is an alternative, noncompetitive hiring process for qualified applicants with disabilities. All permanent classified civil service job positions are eligible for a 700-hour on-the-job demonstration experience and all permanent classified civil service job postings must provide information regarding the on-the-job demonstration overview and certification process. new text end new text begin (b) The county's chief executive officer, or the officer's designee, must authorize the probationary appointment of an applicant if the applicant has successfully demonstrated qualifications for the position through completion of an on-the-job demonstration experience. The county's chief executive officer, or the officer's designee, must convert a qualified applicant to a probationary appointment at the point in the 700-hour on-the-job experience when the applicant has demonstrated the ability to perform the essential functions of the job with or without reasonable accommodation. Implementation of this section is not a violation of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 363A. new text end new text begin (c) The county chief executive officer is responsible for the administration and oversight of the 700-hour on-the-job demonstration experience pilot program, including the establishment of policies and procedures, data collection and reporting requirements, and compliance. new text end new text begin (d) The county chief executive officer must develop, administer, and make public a formal grievance process for individuals in the 700-hour on-the-job demonstration experience pilot program. new text end new text begin (e) A county must make reasonable accommodations in response to a request from an applicant with a disability, including providing accommodations in a timely manner during the application and hiring process and throughout the 700-hour on-the-job demonstration experience. Requirements for accessibility for public records under Minnesota Statutes, section 363A.42, and continuing education under Minnesota Statutes, section 363A.43, apply to a county filling an appointment during the application and hiring process and through the on-the-job demonstration experience period. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Consultation with state agencies. new text end new text begin The commissioners of management and budget and employment and economic development must provide technical expertise to Hennepin County and Ramsey County based on administration of the executive branch 700-hour on-the-job demonstration experience program under Minnesota Statutes, section 43A.15, subdivision 14. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Required training. new text end new text begin The commissioner of management and budget must modify the training curriculum under Minnesota Statutes, section 43A.15, subdivision 14, paragraph (d), to include the requirements of this section and provide the modified curriculum to Hennepin County and Ramsey County. All county executive leaders, managers, supervisors, human resources professionals, affirmative action officers, and Americans with Disabilities Act coordinators must attend training on the curriculum at least once during calendar year 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Survey required. new text end new text begin On or before October 1, 2027, Hennepin County and Ramsey County must survey the participants in the 700-hour on-the-job demonstration experience pilot program who are hired and those who are not hired, as well as the managers of participants in the pilot program. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report to legislature. new text end new text begin (a) On or before December 1, 2027, Hennepin County and Ramsey County must submit the following statistics from the pilot program under this section to the commissioner of management and budget: new text end new text begin (1) the number of certifications submitted, granted, and rejected; new text end new text begin (2) the number of applicants interviewed, appointed, and converted to probationary status; new text end new text begin (3) the number of employees retained for more than six months in county employment; new text end new text begin (4) the number of employees with terminated appointments and the reason for termination; new text end new text begin (5) the average length of time in an on-the-job demonstration appointment; new text end new text begin (6) the number and category of entity certifications; new text end new text begin (7) the number of appointments and hires and the number of managers and supervisors trained; and new text end new text begin (8) the results of the survey under subdivision 5. new text end new text begin (b) On or before January 15, 2028, the commissioner of management and budget shall report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government finance and policy and local government policy on the information in paragraph (a) and any other information the commissioner deems relevant to the pilot program under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end